Illinois, session 104th, HB3263.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 5adding Section 12-4.57a as follows: 6    (305 ILCS 5/12-4.57a new)7    Sec. 12-4.57a. Prospective Payment System rates; increases 8for federally qualified health centers. Notwithstanding any 9other law to the contrary, beginning July 1, 2025, and for 10subsequent years thereafter, the Prospective Payment System 11rates for Federally Qualified Health Centers (FQHC) shall be 12increased by $100,000,000 using an alternative payment method 13acceptable to the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid 14Services and a trade association representing a majority of 15FQHCs operating in Illinois, including a rate increase that is 16an equal percentage increase to the rates paid to each FQHC. 17    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 182025.